Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-142
Historical vehicle or parts vehicle;
sale or transfer; parts vehicle;
bill of sale; prohibited act; violation; penalty.

(1) The sale
or trade and subsequent legal transfer of ownership of a historical vehicle
or parts vehicle shall not be contingent upon any condition that would require
the historical vehicle or parts vehicle to be in operating condition at the
time of the sale or transfer of ownership.

(2) No owner of a parts
vehicle shall sell or otherwise dispose of the parts vehicle without delivering
to the purchaser a bill of sale for the parts vehicle prescribed by the department.
The bill of sale may include, but shall not be limited to, the vehicle identification
number, the year, make, and model of the vehicle, the name and residential
and mailing addresses of the owner and purchaser, the acquisition date, and
the odometer statement provided for in section 60-192. A person who uses a
bill of sale for a parts vehicle to transfer ownership of any vehicle that
does not meet the definition of a parts vehicle shall be guilty of a Class
III misdemeanor.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 42;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB241, § 4.